Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 2 STATE BOARD OF PAROLE
17-2-201.5. Study of parole system. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 30, § 9, effective March 20.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 842, § 29, effective May 24.

17-2-202. Request for transfer - penitentiary to reformatory. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 914, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 641, § 11, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 17-1-202 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-202.5. Administrative hearing officers and release hearing officers - qualifications - duties.

To be eligible to serve as an administrative hearing officer or administrative law judge under contract with the board, an attorney shall have five years' experience in the practice of law and be knowledgeable of parole laws and guidelines, offender rehabilitation, correctional administration, the functioning of the criminal justice system, issues associated with victims of crime, the duties of parole board members, and actuarial risk assessment instruments and other offender assessment instruments used by the board and the department of corrections.

An administrative hearing officer or administrative law judge under contract with the board is required to complete twelve hours annually of continuing education or training consistent with section 17-2-201 (1)(e).

An administrative hearing officer or administrative law judge under contract with the board shall comply with the data and information collection on decision-making as required by section 17-22.5-404 (6) and shall transmit this information as directed by the chairperson or board policy.

The sole remedy for failure to comply with training and data collection requirements shall be termination of the employee, and the failure to comply with training and data collection requirements shall not create any right for any offender.

A release hearing officer shall have three years of relevant experience and be knowledgeable of parole laws and guidelines, offender rehabilitation, correctional administration, the functioning of the criminal justice system, the issues associated with victims of crime, the duties of parole board members, and actuarial risk assessment instruments and other offender assessment instruments used by the board and the department of corrections.

A release hearing officer under contract with the board is required to complete twelve hours annually of continuing education or training consistent with section 17-2-201 (1)(e).

A release hearing officer shall comply with the data and information collection on decision-making required by section 17-22.5-404 (6) and shall transmit this information as directed by the chairperson or board policy.

The sole remedy for failure to comply with training and data collection requirements shall be termination of the employee, and the failure to comply with training and data collection requirements shall not create any right for any offender.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, p. 835, § 5, effective May 23.

17-2-203. Request for transfer - reformatory to penitentiary. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 914, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 705, § 88, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 17-1-203 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-204. Parole may issue - when.

The board, pursuant to rules and regulations, may issue a parole or permit to go at large to any inmate who now is imprisoned in a correctional facility and who may have served the minimum term pronounced by the court or, in the absence of such minimum term pronounced by the court, the minimum term provided by law for the crime for which he was convicted.

Any inmate who does not wish to be considered for parole shall sign a waiver witnessed by an institutional supervisory employee no later than thirty days prior to the date of the scheduled parole hearing. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), any waiver signed by an inmate in accordance with this subsection (2) shall become effective on the date of signing and shall remain in effect for six months after the date of the scheduled parole hearing. The inmate may not withdraw such waiver or submit an application for parole at any time during the six-month period.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), an inmate who waives parole consideration may, no later than thirty days prior to the date of the scheduled parole hearing, make a written request that the six-month waiver period be shortened to a lesser period of time. Such request shall specifically state grounds constituting sufficient and reasonable cause as to why the six-month waiver period should be shortened. Such request shall also specifically state the lesser period of time being requested by the inmate. The chairperson of the board, vice-chairperson of the board, or the designee of either, in his or her discretion, shall grant or deny the inmate's request for the shortened waiver period made under this paragraph (b).

If the inmate's request for the shortened waiver period is made and granted in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the inmate may not, at any time prior to the date of the rescheduled parole hearing, make another such request. In the event such inmate is not prepared for or otherwise not ready to proceed at the rescheduled parole hearing, the inmate shall be deemed to have waived parole consideration for a period of six months following the date of such hearing.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 914, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 688, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 640, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 38, § 1, effective March 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-1-204 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-205. Time of parole not considered when convict is reincarcerated. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 915, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 689, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 524, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 17-1-205 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-206. Parole not to be construed as discharge. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 915, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 689, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 959, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 524, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 17-1-206 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-207. Parole - regulations.

Repealed.

Offenders on parole shall remain under legal custody and shall be subject at any time to be returned to a correctional facility.

From and after the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of the parole of any prisoner and until his return to custody, he shall be deemed a parole violator and fugitive from justice, and no part of the time during which he was on parole shall be deemed a part of his term.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 915, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 689, § 31, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 1635, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) and (2) repealed, p. 524, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(3) amended, p. 640, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (HB 10-1374), ch. 261, p. 1181, § 4, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-1-207 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For other provisions concerning parole regulations, see § 17-22.5-104.

17-2-208. Effective date and application. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 915, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 689, § 32, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1635, § 27, effective July 19.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 524, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 17-1-208 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-209. Civil proceedings - inmate subject to parole.

When an inmate has met all of the requirements to be eligible for parole, but the board has reason to believe that the inmate may have a mental health disorder as defined in section 27-65-102, the board shall initiate civil proceedings pursuant to article 23 of this title 17 and articles 10.5, 65, 67, 92, 93, and 94 of title 27.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 641, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1398, § 45, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, page 784, § 25, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1303, § 131, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-1-209 as it existed prior to 1977.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

17-2-210. Duties of board.

The board, acting through its chairperson or an assistant or a community parole officer, shall promptly commence civil proceedings pursuant to section 17-2-209 and shall notify the office of the attorney general, who shall then represent the board in the hearings.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 641, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 658, § 7, effective April 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-1-210 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-211. Jurisdiction of courts.

All civil actions under sections 17-2-209 to 17-2-212 shall be brought in the court of proper jurisdiction in the county of Pueblo, state of Colorado. Wherever and whenever possible, qualified witnesses in the field of mental health shall be obtained from the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1143, § 6, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-1-211 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-212. Duty of warden.

If the board has previously considered an inmate for release and the inmate is still imprisoned and if the inmate's mental condition is questioned by a warden of a correctional facility, it is the duty of said warden to notify the chairperson of the board at least forty days prior to the discharge of the inmate, and the chairperson then shall proceed in the same manner outlined in sections 17-2-210 and 17-2-211.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 916, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 690, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 641, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 842, § 30, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-1-212 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-2-213. Application of part.

Effective July 1, 1979, the provisions of this part 2 relating to the power of the state board of parole to grant parole and to establish the duration of the term of parole shall apply only to persons sentenced for conviction of a felony committed prior to July 1, 1979, persons sentenced for conviction of a misdemeanor, persons sentenced for conviction of a sex offense, as defined in section 18-1.3-903 (5), C.R.S., or a class 1 felony, and persons sentenced as habitual criminals pursuant to section 18-1.3-801, C.R.S. Parole for persons sentenced for conviction of a class 2, class 3, class 4, or class 5 felony committed on or after July 1, 1979, or a level 1, level 2, level 3, or level 4 drug felony committed on or after October 1, 2013, shall be as provided in sections 18-1.3-401 and 18-1.3-401.5, C.R.S., and article 22.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 667, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1501, § 160, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1932, § 48, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-2-214. Right to attend parole hearings.

The victim of any crime or any person requested by the victim to appear on behalf of such victim or a relative of the victim, if the victim has died or is a minor or is incapacitated and unable to appear, has the right to attend any parole proceeding under this title relative to said crime and has the right to appear, personally or with counsel, at the proceeding and to reasonably express his or her views concerning the crime, the offender, and whether or not the offender should be released on parole, and if so released under what conditions. The board, in deciding whether to release the offender on parole, and if so under what conditions, shall consider the testimony of such person.

In the case of any offenses described in section 24-4.1-302 (1) or section 16-22-102 (9), notice of any parole proceeding must be sent by the department of corrections, working in cooperation with the board, to any victim of the crime or relative of the victim, if the victim has died, at least sixty days before the hearing. Such notice must be sent to the last address in the possession of the department of corrections or the board, and the victim of the crime or relative of the victim, if the victim has died, has the duty to keep the department of corrections or the board informed of his or her most current address.

In the case of any offenses other than offenses described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, notice of any parole proceeding must be sent by the department of corrections, working in cooperation with the board, upon request of the victim to the department of corrections or the board, to any victim of the crime or relative of a victim, if the victim has died, who makes such a request at least sixty days before the hearing. Such notice shall be sent to the last address in the possession of the department of corrections or the board, and the victim of the crime or relative of the victim, if the victim has died, has the duty to keep the department of corrections or the board informed of his or her most current address.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 499, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 643, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2599, § 11, effective June 3.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1064), ch. 296, p. 2750, § 3, effective May 28.

Cross references:

For the right to attend sentencing proceedings, see § 16-11-601; for the right to attend dispositional, review, and restitution proceedings under the "Colorado Children's Code", see § 19-2-112.

17-2-215. Notification of parole proceeding.

In addition to the notice required by section 17-2-214 (2), the department of corrections shall establish a system of notification under which any person may make a written request to the department of corrections or the board for the notification of any parole proceeding concerning an offender, which notice shall be given by the department of corrections, working in cooperation with the board, at least thirty days before the hearing. Such notice shall be sent to the last-known address of the person making a written request for notification in the possession of the department of corrections or the board, and the person making such written request for notification has the duty to keep the department of corrections or the board informed of his or her current address.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 644, § 4.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2599, § 12, effective June 3.

17-2-216. Application of sections 17-2-214 and 17-2-215.

The provisions of sections 17-2-214 and 17-2-215 shall apply to any parole proceeding held on or after July 1, 1985, irrespective of when the offender was sentenced or incarcerated.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 644, § 4, effective July 1.

17-2-217. Release hearing officers - pilot program.

The department and the board are hereby authorized to conduct a release hearing officers pilot program that utilizes the officers described in section 17-2-201 (3)(h.1).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 502, § 4, effective May 16.

L. 2008:

(2) repealed, p. 1888, § 50, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1701, § 20, effective May 29.